Maine, session 132, LD2062.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 23 MRSA §4209-B is enacted to read:
§4209-B. Public transit bus vehicle security barriers
1. Short title. This section may be known and cited as "the Public Transit Bus
Operator Safety Act."
2. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Fund" means the Public Transit Bus Operator Safety Fund established in
subsection 4.
B. "Public transit agency" means an entity, including a municipal, regional or state
authority, that operates public transportation services within the State.
C. "Public transit bus" means a motor vehicle, as defined in Title 29-A, section 101,
subsection 42, that is designed to carry more than 15 persons, including the public
transit bus operator, and that is operated by a public transit agency or by a private
company contracted to provide public transit service on behalf of a public transit
agency.
D. "Public transit bus operator" means an individual employed to operate a public
transit bus.
E. "Vehicle security barrier" means a transparent, protective partition made of hard,
durable materials that:
(1) Is capable of fully enclosing the public transit bus operator's workstation and
of preventing the unwanted entry of individuals, fluids and objects into the
workstation;
(2) Does not impede the public transit bus operator's lines of sight from the
workstation to the exterior of the public transit bus; and
(3) Allows the public transit bus operator to maintain communications with
passengers.
3. Mandatory installation of vehicle security barriers. In accordance with the
timeline and standards established under this subsection, a public transit agency shall install
or arrange for the installation of vehicle security barriers in all public transit buses.
A. The department, in consultation with public transit agencies, labor organizations
representing public transit bus operators and joint labor-management safety
committees, if any, shall establish through rulemaking minimum standards for vehicle
security barriers. Such standards must address the design, materials and installation
specifications of vehicle security barriers.
B. When procuring vehicle security barriers and any other materials funded by the fund,
a public transit agency shall consult with a labor organization representing the public
transit agency's public transit bus operators and a joint labor-management safety
committee, if the public transit agency is party to such a committee.
C. A public transit bus that does not have a vehicle security barrier installed may not
be operated on or after August 1, 2029.
Page 1 - 132LR2647(01)

4. Public Transit Bus Operator Safety Fund. The Public Transit Bus Operator
Safety Fund is established within the department as a nonlapsing fund to provide grants to
public transit agencies for the purchase, installation and maintenance of vehicle security
barriers. Beginning August 1, 2029, the fund may provide grants to public transit agencies
for expenditures, other than for vehicle security barriers, to improve transit bus operator
safety, and a public transit agency may apply for such a grant as determined jointly by the
public transit agency and a labor organization representing public transit bus operators and
a joint labor-management safety committee, if any. The fund consists of money received
as appropriations, allocations and contributions from public and private sources.
5. Reporting requirements. Before August 1, 2027, 2028 and 2029, each public
transit agency shall submit an annual report to the department regarding the progress of the
public transit agency in installing vehicle security barriers as required by this section. Each
report must set forth the steps that the public transit agency has taken to comply with the
requirements to install vehicle security barriers, the tasks remaining for the public transit
agency to complete in order to achieve full compliance and an estimated completion date
for each of these tasks. The department shall make the reports required under this
subsection available to the public within 30 days of receiving the reports.
6. Rules. The department shall adopt rules to implement this section. Rules adopted
pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 2. Department of Transportation to establish standards for vehicle
security barriers in public transit buses. Before February 1, 2027, the Department
of Transportation shall establish through rulemaking minimum standards for vehicle
security barriers in public transit buses in accordance with the Maine Revised Statutes,
Title 23, section 4209-B, subsection 3.
Sec. 3. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
TRANSPORTATION, DEPARTMENT OF
Public Transit Bus Operator Safety Fund N559
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to the Public Transit Bus Operator Safety Fund within
the Department of Transportation to provide grants to public transit agencies for the
purchase, installation and maintenance of vehicle security barriers.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $2,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $2,000,000